test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NI_I_miskweyaab_gt-norm.yaml
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pej+Obv+Px3Pl: [miskweyaabiinyshiwaan, miskweyaabiinymishwaan]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pej+Loc+Px3Pl: [miskweyaabiinyshiwaang, miskweyaabiinymishwaang]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pej+Pl+Px3Pl: [miskweyaabiinyshiwaan, miskweyaabiinymishwaan]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pej+Obv+Px4: [miskweyaabiinyshinwan, miskweyaabiinymishniwan]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pej+Loc+Px4: [miskweyaabiinyshiniing, miskweyaabiinymishniing]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pej+Pl+Px4: [miskweyaabiinyshinwan, miskweyaabiinymishniwan]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pej+Obv+Px3Pl: [miskweyaabiinsshiwaan, miskweyaabiinsmishwaan]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pej+Loc+Px3Pl: [miskweyaabiinsshiwaang, miskweyaabiinsmishwaang]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pej+Pl+Px3Pl: [miskweyaabiinsshiwaan, miskweyaabiinsmishwaan]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pej+Obv+Px4: [miskweyaabiinsshinwan, miskweyaabiinsmishniwan]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pej+Loc+Px4: [miskweyaabiinsshiniing, miskweyaabiinsmishniing]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pej+Pl+Px4: [miskweyaabiinsshinwan, miskweyaabiinsmishniwan]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [1, 2, 4, 6, 7]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pej+Prt+Obv+Px1Sg: [nmiskweyaabiinyshibniin, nmiskweyaabiinymishbaniin]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pej+Prt+Loc+Px1Sg: [nmiskweyaabiinyshibniing, nmiskweyaabiinymishbaniing]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pej+Prt+Pl+Px1Sg: [nmiskweyaabiinyshibniin, nmiskweyaabiinymishbaniin]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt+Obv+Px1Sg: [nmiskweyaabiinsshibniin, nmiskweyaabiinsmishbaniin]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt+Loc+Px1Sg: [nmiskweyaabiinsshibniing, nmiskweyaabiinsmishbaniing]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt+Pl+Px1Sg: [nmiskweyaabiinsshibniin, nmiskweyaabiinsmishbaniin]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pej+Prt+Obv+Px2Sg: [gmiskweyaabiinyshibniin, gmiskweyaabiinymishbaniin]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pej+Prt+Loc+Px2Sg: [gmiskweyaabiinyshibniing, gmiskweyaabiinymishbaniing]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pej+Prt+Pl+Px2Sg: [gmiskweyaabiinyshibniin, gmiskweyaabiinymishbaniin]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt+Obv+Px2Sg: [gmiskweyaabiinsshibniin, gmiskweyaabiinsmishbaniin]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt+Loc+Px2Sg: [gmiskweyaabiinsshibniing, gmiskweyaabiinsmishbaniing]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt+Pl+Px2Sg: [gmiskweyaabiinsshibniin, gmiskweyaabiinsmishbaniin]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pej+Prt+Obv+Px3Sg: [miskweyaabiinyshibniin, miskweyaabiinymishbaniin]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pej+Prt+Loc+Px3Sg: [miskweyaabiinyshibniing, miskweyaabiinymishbaniing]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pej+Prt+Pl+Px3Sg: [miskweyaabiinyshibniin, miskweyaabiinymishbaniin]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt+Obv+Px3Sg: [miskweyaabiinsshibniin, miskweyaabiinsmishbaniin]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt+Loc+Px3Sg: [miskweyaabiinsshibniing, miskweyaabiinsmishbaniing]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt+Pl+Px3Sg: [miskweyaabiinsshibniin, miskweyaabiinsmishbaniin]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pej+Prt+Obv+PxX: [miskweyaabiinyshibniin, miskweyaabiinymishbaniin]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pej+Prt+Loc+PxX: [miskweyaabiinyshibniing, miskweyaabiinymishbaniing]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pej+Prt+Pl+PxX: [miskweyaabiinyshibniin, miskweyaabiinymishbaniin]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt+Obv+PxX: [miskweyaabiinsshibniin, miskweyaabiinsmishbaniin]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt+Loc+PxX: [miskweyaabiinsshibniing, miskweyaabiinsmishbaniing]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt+Pl+PxX: [miskweyaabiinsshibniin, miskweyaabiinsmishbaniin]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [1, 2, 5, 6, 7]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Prt+Obv+Px1Pl: [nmiskweyaabiinynaanbaniin, nmiskweyaabiinyminaanbaniin]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Prt+Loc+Px1Pl: [nmiskweyaabiinynaanbaniing, nmiskweyaabiinyminaanbaniing]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Prt+Pl+Px1Pl: [nmiskweyaabiinynaanbaniin, nmiskweyaabiinyminaanbaniin]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Prt+Obv+Px1Pl: [nmiskweyaabiinsnaanbaniin, nmiskweyaabiinsminaanbaniin]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Prt+Loc+Px1Pl: [nmiskweyaabiinsnaanbaniing, nmiskweyaabiinsminaanbaniing]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Prt+Pl+Px1Pl: [nmiskweyaabiinsnaanbaniin, nmiskweyaabiinsminaanbaniin]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Prt+Obv+Px21Pl: [gmiskweyaabiinynaanbaniin, gmiskweyaabiinyminaanbaniin]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Prt+Loc+Px21Pl: [gmiskweyaabiinynaanbaniing, gmiskweyaabiinyminaanbaniing]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Prt+Pl+Px21Pl: [gmiskweyaabiinynaanbaniin, gmiskweyaabiinyminaanbaniin]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Prt+Obv+Px2Pl: [gmiskweyaabiinywaabniin, gmiskweyaabiinymiwaabniin]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Prt+Loc+Px2Pl: [gmiskweyaabiinywaabniing, gmiskweyaabiinymiwaabniing]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Prt+Pl+Px2Pl: [gmiskweyaabiinywaabniin, gmiskweyaabiinymiwaabniin]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Prt+Obv+Px21Pl: [gmiskweyaabiinsnaanbaniin, gmiskweyaabiinsminaanbaniin]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Prt+Loc+Px21Pl: [gmiskweyaabiinsnaanbaniing, gmiskweyaabiinsminaanbaniing]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Prt+Pl+Px21Pl: [gmiskweyaabiinsnaanbaniin, gmiskweyaabiinsminaanbaniin]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Prt+Obv+Px2Pl: [gmiskweyaabiinswaabniin, gmiskweyaabiinsmiwaabniin]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Prt+Loc+Px2Pl: [gmiskweyaabiinswaabniing, gmiskweyaabiinsmiwaabniing]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Prt+Pl+Px2Pl: [gmiskweyaabiinswaabniin, gmiskweyaabiinsmiwaabniin]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Prt+Obv+Px3Pl: [miskweyaabiinywaabniin, miskweyaabiinymiwaabniin]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Prt+Loc+Px3Pl: [miskweyaabiinywaabniing, miskweyaabiinymiwaabniing]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Prt+Pl+Px3Pl: [miskweyaabiinywaabniin, miskweyaabiinymiwaabniin]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Prt+Obv+Px4: [miskweyaabiinyniwbaniin, miskweyaabiinyminwibniin]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Prt+Loc+Px4: [miskweyaabiinyniwbaniing, miskweyaabiinyminwibniing]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Prt+Pl+Px4: [miskweyaabiinyniwbaniin, miskweyaabiinyminwibniin]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Prt+Obv+Px3Pl: [miskweyaabiinswaabniin, miskweyaabiinsmiwaabniin]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Prt+Loc+Px3Pl: [miskweyaabiinswaabniing, miskweyaabiinsmiwaabniing]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Prt+Pl+Px3Pl: [miskweyaabiinswaabniin, miskweyaabiinsmiwaabniin]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Prt+Obv+Px4: [miskweyaabiinsniwbaniin, miskweyaabiinsminwibniin]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Prt+Loc+Px4: [miskweyaabiinsniwbaniing, miskweyaabiinsminwibniing]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Prt+Pl+Px4: [miskweyaabiinsniwbaniin, miskweyaabiinsminwibniin]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [1, 3, 4, 5, 6]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [1, 3, 4, 5, 7]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [1, 3, 4, 6, 7]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [1, 3, 5, 6, 7]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [1, 4, 5, 6, 7]
     mskweyaap+NI+Pej+Prt+Obv+Px1Pl: [nmiskweyaabiishnaanbaniin, nmiskweyaabiimshinaanbaniin]
     mskweyaap+NI+Pej+Prt+Loc+Px1Pl: [nmiskweyaabiishnaanbaniing, nmiskweyaabiimshinaanbaniing]
     mskweyaap+NI+Pej+Prt+Pl+Px1Pl: [nmiskweyaabiishnaanbaniin, nmiskweyaabiimshinaanbaniin]
     mskweyaap+NI+Pej+Prt+Obv+Px21Pl: [gmiskweyaabiishnaanbaniin, gmiskweyaabiimshinaanbaniin]
     mskweyaap+NI+Pej+Prt+Loc+Px21Pl: [gmiskweyaabiishnaanbaniing, gmiskweyaabiimshinaanbaniing]
     mskweyaap+NI+Pej+Prt+Pl+Px21Pl: [gmiskweyaabiishnaanbaniin, gmiskweyaabiimshinaanbaniin]
     mskweyaap+NI+Pej+Prt+Obv+Px2Pl: [gmiskweyaabiishwaabniin, gmiskweyaabiimshiwaabniin]
     mskweyaap+NI+Pej+Prt+Loc+Px2Pl: [gmiskweyaabiishwaabniing, gmiskweyaabiimshiwaabniing]
     mskweyaap+NI+Pej+Prt+Pl+Px2Pl: [gmiskweyaabiishwaabniin, gmiskweyaabiimshiwaabniin]
     mskweyaap+NI+Pej+Prt+Obv+Px3Pl: [miskweyaabiishwaabniin, miskweyaabiimshiwaabniin]
     mskweyaap+NI+Pej+Prt+Loc+Px3Pl: [miskweyaabiishwaabniing, miskweyaabiimshiwaabniing]
     mskweyaap+NI+Pej+Prt+Pl+Px3Pl: [miskweyaabiishwaabniin, miskweyaabiimshiwaabniin]
     mskweyaap+NI+Pej+Prt+Obv+Px4: [miskweyaabiishniwbaniin, miskweyaabiimshinwibniin]
     mskweyaap+NI+Pej+Prt+Loc+Px4: [miskweyaabiishniwbaniing, miskweyaabiimshinwibniing]
     mskweyaap+NI+Pej+Prt+Pl+Px4: [miskweyaabiishniwbaniin, miskweyaabiimshinwibniin]
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 7]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [1, 2, 3, 4, 6, 7]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [1, 2, 3, 5, 6, 7]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [1, 2, 4, 5, 6, 7]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pej+Prt+Obv+Px1Pl: [nmiskweyaabiinyshinaanbaniin, nmiskweyaabiinymishnaanbaniin]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pej+Prt+Loc+Px1Pl: [nmiskweyaabiinyshinaanbaniing, nmiskweyaabiinymishnaanbaniing]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pej+Prt+Pl+Px1Pl: [nmiskweyaabiinyshinaanbaniin, nmiskweyaabiinymishnaanbaniin]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt+Obv+Px1Pl: [nmiskweyaabiinsshinaanbaniin, nmiskweyaabiinsmishnaanbaniin]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt+Loc+Px1Pl: [nmiskweyaabiinsshinaanbaniing, nmiskweyaabiinsmishnaanbaniing]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt+Pl+Px1Pl: [nmiskweyaabiinsshinaanbaniin, nmiskweyaabiinsmishnaanbaniin]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pej+Prt+Obv+Px21Pl: [gmiskweyaabiinyshinaanbaniin, gmiskweyaabiinymishnaanbaniin]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pej+Prt+Loc+Px21Pl: [gmiskweyaabiinyshinaanbaniing, gmiskweyaabiinymishnaanbaniing]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pej+Prt+Pl+Px21Pl: [gmiskweyaabiinyshinaanbaniin, gmiskweyaabiinymishnaanbaniin]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pej+Prt+Obv+Px2Pl: [gmiskweyaabiinyshiwaabniin, gmiskweyaabiinymishwaabniin]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pej+Prt+Loc+Px2Pl: [gmiskweyaabiinyshiwaabniing, gmiskweyaabiinymishwaabniing]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pej+Prt+Pl+Px2Pl: [gmiskweyaabiinyshiwaabniin, gmiskweyaabiinymishwaabniin]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt+Obv+Px21Pl: [gmiskweyaabiinsshinaanbaniin, gmiskweyaabiinsmishnaanbaniin]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt+Loc+Px21Pl: [gmiskweyaabiinsshinaanbaniing, gmiskweyaabiinsmishnaanbaniing]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt+Pl+Px21Pl: [gmiskweyaabiinsshinaanbaniin, gmiskweyaabiinsmishnaanbaniin]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt+Obv+Px2Pl: [gmiskweyaabiinsshiwaabniin, gmiskweyaabiinsmishwaabniin]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt+Loc+Px2Pl: [gmiskweyaabiinsshiwaabniing, gmiskweyaabiinsmishwaabniing]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt+Pl+Px2Pl: [gmiskweyaabiinsshiwaabniin, gmiskweyaabiinsmishwaabniin]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pej+Prt+Obv+Px3Pl: [miskweyaabiinyshiwaabniin, miskweyaabiinymishwaabniin]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pej+Prt+Loc+Px3Pl: [miskweyaabiinyshiwaabniing, miskweyaabiinymishwaabniing]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pej+Prt+Pl+Px3Pl: [miskweyaabiinyshiwaabniin, miskweyaabiinymishwaabniin]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pej+Prt+Obv+Px4: [miskweyaabiinyshinwibniin, miskweyaabiinymishniwbaniin]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pej+Prt+Loc+Px4: [miskweyaabiinyshinwibniing, miskweyaabiinymishniwbaniing]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pej+Prt+Pl+Px4: [miskweyaabiinyshinwibniin, miskweyaabiinymishniwbaniin]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt+Obv+Px3Pl: [miskweyaabiinsshiwaabniin, miskweyaabiinsmishwaabniin]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt+Loc+Px3Pl: [miskweyaabiinsshiwaabniing, miskweyaabiinsmishwaabniing]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt+Pl+Px3Pl: [miskweyaabiinsshiwaabniin, miskweyaabiinsmishwaabniin]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt+Obv+Px4: [miskweyaabiinsshinwibniin, miskweyaabiinsmishniwbaniin]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt+Loc+Px4: [miskweyaabiinsshinwibniing, miskweyaabiinsmishniwbaniing]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt+Pl+Px4: [miskweyaabiinsshinwibniin, miskweyaabiinsmishniwbaniin]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [1, 3, 4, 5, 6, 7]
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 7]
     
